Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-222
Maximum liability.

The maximum liability which may be incurred by any trust company organized under the Nebraska Trust Company Act, exclusive of money or properties held in trust and exclusive of money borrowed for investment and actually invested in real estate mortgages and other securities in which trust companies are authorized to invest under the act, shall not exceed one hundred percent of the paid-up capital stock.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 10, p. 194;

R.S.1913, § 748;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 16, p. 723;

C.S.1922, § 8078;

Laws 1923, c. 32, § 1, p. 142;

C.S.1929, § 8-217;

R.S.1943, § 8-222;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 37;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 47.